Wisconsin, session 2025, AB847.
do enact as follows:AB847,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB847,28Section 2. 20.455 (2) (er) of the statutes is created to read:AB847,2,11920.455 (2) (er) Alternatives to incarceration; mental health treatment; grants. 10The amounts in the schedule for awarding grants to counties and tribes under s. 11165.958.AB847,312Section 3. 165.95 (5) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB847,2,1713165.95 (5) (b) A county or tribe that receives a grant under this section shall 14comply with state audits and shall submit an annual report to the department of 15justice and to the oversight committee created under par. (a) regarding the impact 16of the program on jail and prison populations and its progress in attaining the goals 17specified in sub. (3) (b) and (f).AB847,418Section 4. 165.958 of the statutes is created to read:AB847,2,2019165.958 Alternatives to incarceration; mental health treatment. (1) 20In this section:AB847,3,11(a) “Department” means the department of justice.AB847,3,22(b) “Mental illness” has the meaning given in s. 51.01 (13) (a).AB847,3,33(c) “Tribe” has the meaning given in s. 165.91 (1).AB847,3,114(2) The department shall award grants to counties and to tribes to enable 5them to establish and operate or expand programs, including suspended and 6deferred prosecution programs and programs based on principles of restorative 7justice, that provide alternatives to prosecution and incarceration for criminal 8offenders who are low to medium risk and who have a mental illness that is a 9contributing factor to their interaction with the criminal justice system. The 10department shall collaborate with the department of corrections and the 11department of health services in establishing this grant program.AB847,3,1312(3) A county or tribe shall be eligible for a grant under sub. (2) if all of the 13following apply:AB847,3,1614(a) The department, working with the criminal justice coordinating council, 15counties, and tribes, identifies the county or tribe as well-positioned to achieve 16impact quickly and effectively if awarded a grant.AB847,3,2017(b) The county or tribe has a program that is designed to meet the needs of a 18person who has a mental illness and who may be or has been charged with, or who 19has been convicted of, a crime and the person has a mental illness that is a 20contributing factor, and the program does all of the following:AB847,3,23211. Addresses low-to-medium risk persons with mental illness before the 22person is charged or before the person is prosecuted by use of a deferred prosecution 23program.AB847,4,212. Focuses on restorative justice principles targeted at addressing mental 2health needs.AB847,4,63(c) The program is designed to promote public safety, reduce prison and jail 4populations, reduce prosecution and incarceration costs, reduce recidivism, and 5improve the welfare of participants’ families by meeting the comprehensive needs of 6participants.AB847,4,97(d) The program establishes eligibility criteria for a person’s participation. 8The criteria shall specify that a violent offender, as defined in s. 165.95 (1) (bg), is 9not eligible to participate in the program.AB847,4,1210(e) Services provided under the program are consistent with evidence-based 11practices in mental health treatment, as determined by the department of health 12services.AB847,4,1813(f) The program provides holistic treatment to its participants and provides 14them services that may be needed, as determined under the program, to improve 15their mental health, facilitate their gainful employment or enhanced education or 16training, provide them stable housing, facilitate family reunification, ensure 17payment of child support, and increase the payment of other court-ordered 18obligations.AB847,5,219(g) The program is designed to integrate all mental health services provided 20to program participants by state and local government agencies and other 21organizations. The program shall require regular communication among a 22participant’s service providers, the case manager, and any person designated under 23the program to monitor the person’s compliance with his or her obligations under 1the program and any probation, extended supervision, and parole agent assigned to 2the participant.AB847,5,43(h) The program provides mental health treatment services through 4providers that are certified by the department of health services.AB847,5,85(i) The program requires participants to pay a reasonable amount for their 6treatment, based on their income and available assets, and pursues and uses all 7possible resources available through insurance and federal, state, and local aid 8programs, including cash, vouchers, and direct services.AB847,5,159(j) The program is developed with input from, and implemented in 10collaboration with, one or more circuit court judges, the district attorney, the state 11public defender, local and, if applicable, tribal law enforcement officials, county 12agencies and, if applicable, tribal agencies responsible for providing social services, 13child welfare, mental health, and the Wisconsin Works program, the departments 14of corrections, children and families, and health services, and private social 15services agencies.AB847,5,1716(k) The county or tribe complies with other eligibility requirements 17established by the department to promote the objectives listed in pars. (b) and (c).AB847,6,518(4) (a) A court or tribe who is awarded a grant under this section shall create 19an oversight committee to advise the county or tribe in administering and 20evaluating its program. Each committee shall consist of a circuit court judge, the 21district attorney or his or her designee, the state public defender or his or her 22designee, a local law enforcement official, a representative of the county, a 23representative of the tribe, if applicable, a representative of each other county 24agency and, if applicable, tribal agency responsible for providing social services, 1including services relating to child welfare, mental health, and the Wisconsin 2Works program, representatives of the department of corrections and department 3of health services, a representative from private social services agencies, a 4representative of mental health providers, and other members to be determined by 5the county or tribe.AB847,6,96(b) A county or tribe that receives a grant under this section shall comply with 7state audits and shall submit an annual report to the department and to the 8oversight committee created under par. (a) regarding its progress in attaining the 9goals specified in sub. (3) (c) and (f).AB847,6,1310(c) A county or tribe that receives a grant under this section shall submit data 11requested by the department to the department each month. The department may 12request any data regarding the project funded by the grant that are necessary to 13evaluate the project and prepare the reports under sub. (5).AB847,6,1814(5) (a) The department shall, annually, analyze the data submitted under sub. 15(4) (c) and prepare a progress report that evaluates the effectiveness of the grant 16program. The department shall make the report available to the public and shall 17submit the report to the chief clerk of each house of the legislature for distribution 18to the legislature under s. 13.172 (2).AB847,7,219(b) With advisory input from the criminal justice coordinating council, the 20department shall prepare an implementation report 3 years after the effective date 21of this paragraph .... (LRB inserts date), and prepare a summary outcome report 5 22years after the effective date of this paragraph .... (LRB inserts date). Both reports 23shall analyze data received under this section and the annual reports under par. (a). 1The department shall include in the summary outcome report an opinion as to 2whether to continue, modify, or expand the program.AB847,7,43(6) No grants may be awarded under this section after the June 30 beginning 45 years after the effective date of this subsection .... (LRB inserts date).AB847,55Section 5. 302.43 of the statutes is amended to read:AB847,7,206302.43 Good time. Every inmate of a county jail is eligible to earn good time 7in the amount of one-fourth of his or her term for good behavior if sentenced to at 8least 4 days, but fractions of a day shall be ignored. An inmate shall be given credit 9for time served prior to sentencing under s. 973.155, including good time under s. 10973.155 (4). An inmate who violates any law or any regulation of the jail, or neglects 11or refuses to perform any duty lawfully required of him or her, may be deprived by 12the sheriff of good time under this section, except that the sheriff shall not deprive 13the inmate of more than 2 days good time for any one offense without the approval 14of the court. An inmate who files an action or special proceeding, including a 15petition for a common law writ of certiorari, to which s. 807.15 applies shall be 16deprived of the number of days of good time specified in the court order prepared 17under s. 807.15 (3). This section does not apply to a person who is confined in the 18county jail in connection with his or her participation in a substance abuse 19treatment program that meets the requirements of s. 165.95 (3) or 165.958, as 20determined by the department of justice under s. 165.95 (9) and (10).AB847,621Section 6. 961.472 (5) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB847,7,2422961.472 (5) (b) The person is participating in a substance abuse treatment 23program that meets the requirements of s. 165.95 (3) or 165.958, as determined by 24the department of justice under s. 165.95 (9) and (10).AB847,71Section 7. 967.11 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB847,8,52967.11 (1) In this section, “approved substance abuse treatment program” 3means a substance abuse treatment program that meets the requirements of s. 4165.95 (3) or 165.958, as determined by the department of justice under s. 165.95 5(9) and (10).AB847,86Section 8. 967.11 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB847,8,127967.11 (2) If a county establishes an approved substance abuse treatment 8program and the approved program authorizes the use of surveillance and 9monitoring technology or day reporting programs, a court or a district attorney may 10require a person participating in an the approved substance abuse treatment 11program to submit to surveillance and monitoring technology or a day reporting 12program as a condition of participation.AB847,913Section 9. 973.155 (1m) of the statutes is amended to read:AB847,8,1914973.155 (1m) A convicted offender shall be given credit toward the service of 15his or her sentence for all days spent in custody as part of a substance abuse 16treatment program that meets the requirements of s. 165.95 (3) or 165.958, as 17determined by the department of justice under s. 165.95 (9) and (10), for any offense 18arising out of the course of conduct that led to the person’s placement in that 19program.AB847,1020Section 10. Fiscal changes.AB847,9,521(1) Positions for administering grant program. In the schedule under s. 2220.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department of justice under s. 20.455 (2) (a), 23the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is increased by $150,000 to increase the 1authorized FTE positions for the department by 1.0 GPR position for a program 2manager and by 1.0 GPR position for a research analyst. In the schedule under s. 320.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department of justice under s. 20.455 (2) (a), 4the dollar amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is increased by $300,000 to provide 5funding for the positions authorized under this section. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab847 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab847 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB847 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB847 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB847: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting